Hawaii statutes.
§182-13 Surrender of mining leases.
Any lessee of a mining lease, who has complied fully with all the terms,
covenants, and conditions of the existing lease, may, with the consent of the
board of land and natural resources, surrender at any time and from time to
time all or any part of a mining lease or the land contained therein upon
payments as consideration therefor two years' rent prorated upon the portion of
the lease or land surrendered. The lessee shall thereupon be relieved of any
further liability or duty with respect to the land or lease so surrendered;
provided that nothing herein contained shall constitute a waiver of any
liability or duty the lessee may have with respect to the land or lease
surrendered as a result of any previous activities conducted on the land or
under the lease. Upon the termination, cancellation, or surrender of any
mining lease or any portion thereof, the lessee shall have the right to remove
any and all equipment, buildings, and plants placed on the land surrendered by
the holder of the mining lease. A mining lease may also be surrendered if as a
result of a final determination by a court of competent jurisdiction, the
lessee is found to have acquired no rights in or to the minerals on reserved
lands, nor the right to exploit the same, pursuant to the lease, and, in such
event, the lessee shall be reimbursed for rentals paid to the State pursuant to
the lease. [L 1963, c 11, pt of §1; Supp, §99A-13; HRS §182-13]

Note

The amendment made by L 2014, c 218, §8 is not included in
this section.

Previous
Vol02_Ch0046-0115
Next